North Carolina, session 2025, HB97.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143-166.2(6) reads as rewritten:
"(6) Killed in the line of duty. – This term shall apply to all of the following deaths:
…
e. When the death of a firefighter occurs as a direct and proximate result
of any of the following cancers that are occupationally related to
firefighting, that firefighter is presumed to have been killed in the line
of duty:
1. Mesothelioma.
2. Testicular cancer.
3. Cancer of the small intestine.
4. Esophageal cancer.
5. Oral cavity cancer.
6. Pharynx cancer.
7. Cancer of the stomach, also known as gastric cancer."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
State Treasurer the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in recurring funds for each
year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be used for benefits payable under the Public Safety
Employees' Death Benefits Act related to the implementation of this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025, and applies to qualifying deaths
occurring on or after that date.
*H97-v-1*